Hawaii statutes.
[§673-5] Attorney's fees and costs.
(a) In any action under this chapter, the court shall, upon a specific finding
that a non-prevailing party's claim or defense was frivolous, assess against
such party and award to the prevailing party, and enter as part of its order or
judgment, a reasonable sum for costs and expenses incurred, including
reasonable attorney's fees.

(b) In any action brought under this chapter
in which there is no finding by the court that the claims pled were frivolous
the court may, as it deems just, award to a prevailing plaintiff and enter as a
part of its order or judgment, a reasonable sum for costs and expenses
incurred, including reasonable attorney's fees. [L 1988, c 395, pt of §2]

Cross References

Vexatious litigants, see chapter 634J.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next